North Carolina, session 2025, HB60.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of fifty-two million dollars
($52,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to
increase the Medicaid rates paid for dental services. These funds shall provide a State match for
ninety-five million dollars ($95,000,000) in recurring federal funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and those funds are appropriated to the Division of Health Benefits
for the same purpose.
SECTION 1.(b) The rate increases required by this section shall be implemented as
soon as practicable after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H60-v-1*